Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.160

State publications to be in gender-neutral terms—Exception—Effect of noncompliance.

(1) All rules and directory or advisory publications issued, adopted, or amended by state officers or agencies, as defined by RCW 41.06.020, after July 1, 1983, shall be written in gender-neutral terms unless a specification of gender is intended.

(2) No rule or publication is invalid because it does not comply with this section.

[ 1983 c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1983 c 20: "It is the intent of the legislature to have the state's statutes, rules, and official communications expressed in gender-neutral terms." [ 1983 c 20 s 1.]

Statutes, memorials, and resolutions: RCW 44.04.210.